Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act are added  to and made a part of ORS
chapter 458.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Disaster” means a declared disaster or emergency, as defined in ORS 401.685, that
resulted in the loss or damage of residential units.
(b) “Residential units” includes recreational  vehicles, manufactured dwellings, prefabri-
cated structures, small homes and dwelling units of any type.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 456.559, the Housing and Community Services Department may:
(a) Provide loans, grants or other forms of assistance to repair, replace, rebuild or ad-
dress the infrastructure needs for residential units damaged or destroyed during a disaster.
(b) Support residents of residential units that were damaged or destroyed during  a dis-
aster, including by  providing rental assistance, down payment assistance, housing navigation
assistance, intermediate housing and assistance  relating to housing or recovery associated
with housing loss.
(c) Support the acquisition of  land or property for housing for communities impacted by
disaster.
(3) The department may contract with entities to take action  under this section, includ-
ing directly entering into  construction contracts with general contractors or others and ad-
ministering loans or grants to construct or repair damaged or destroyed residential units.
SECTION 3. (1) The Disaster Housing Recovery Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned by the Disaster Housing
Recovery Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The fund consists of moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited  or transferred to the
fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Housing and Community
Services Department to carry out the purposes of section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4.  ORS 456.559 is amended to read:
456.559. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall:
Enrolled House Bill 3215 (HB 3215-A) Page 1
(a) Maintain current housing data and information concerning available programs, status  of
funding, programs planned or undertaken which  might conflict with, overlap, duplicate or supersede
other planned or existing programs and call these to the attention of appropriate state  agencies,
governmental bodies and public or private housing sponsors.
(b) Maintain current data from local, state  and federal sources concerning publicly supported
housing as that term is defined in ORS 456.250, the status of existing  affordability restrictions as
that term is defined in ORS 456.250 and rental assistance contracts at publicly supported housing.
(c) Provide to appropriate state agencies, governmental  bodies and public or private housing
sponsors such advisory and educational services as will assist them in the development of  housing
plans and projects.
(d) Subject to  the approval of the Oregon Housing Stability Council, make noninterest bearing
advances, in accordance with ORS 456.710 and the  policies of the department, to qualified nonprofit
sponsors for development costs of housing projects until mortgage funds  are released to repay the
advances as provided in ORS 456.710.
(e) Advise and assist  appropriate state agencies, governmental bodies and public or private
housing sponsors, cities and counties, in all  programs and activities which are designed or might
tend to fulfill the purposes of ORS 456.548 to 456.725 and ORS chapter 458.
(f) Encourage and assist in the planning, development, construction,  rehabilitation and conser-
vation of dwelling units for persons and families of lower income.
(g) Be  the central state department to apply for, receive and distribute, on behalf of appropriate
state agencies, governmental bodies and public or private housing sponsors in  the state, grants,
gifts, contributions, loans, credits or assistance from the federal government or any other source  for
housing programs except when the donor, grantor, or lender of such funds specifically directs some
other agency to administer them. Moneys received under this  section shall be deposited with the
State Treasurer in an account separate and distinct from the General Fund.  Interest earned by the
account shall be credited to the account.
(h) For the purposes of acquiring moneys, credits  or other assistance from any agency or
instrumentality of the United States or from any  public corporation chartered by the United States,
comply with any applicable agreements or restrictions for the receipt  of such assistance and become
a member of any such association or public corporation chartered by the United States.
(i) Assist individuals, appropriate state agencies, governmental bodies  and public or private
housing sponsors through a  program which provides housing information, planning, educational
services and technical assistance.
(j) Comply with the requirements of ORS  443.225 in assisting in the development of any housing
for residential care, training or  treatment for persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities
or mental or emotional disturbances.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 456.255 to 456.265,  456.625 (7) [ and], 458.480 to 458.490
and section 2 (3) of this 2023 Act , the  department may not itself develop, construct, rehabilitate
or conserve housing units; and neither the  department nor any housing sponsor, including but not
limited to any association,  corporation, cooperative housing authority or urban renewal agency or-
ganized to provide housing and other facilities under ORS 456.548  to 456.725, may own, acquire,
construct,  purchase,  lease, operate or maintain utility facilities, including facilities for the gener-
ation of electricity, for the distribution of gas and electricity, and for the  conveyance of telephone
and telegraph messages.
(3) In accordance with the provisions of this section and with the advice  of the council, the
department shall establish statewide priorities for housing programs.  State agencies shall coordinate
their housing programs with the department. All state agencies intending to apply for  federal funds
for use in planning, developing or  managing housing, or rendering assistance to governmental bodies
or sponsors or individuals involved therein shall submit a description of the proposed  activity to the
department for review not less than 30 days  prior to the intended date of submission of the appli-
cation to the federal agency. The department shall determine  whether the proposal would result in
a program that would overlap, duplicate or conflict with any other housing program in the  state. If
Enrolled House Bill 3215 (HB 3215-A) Page 2
the department finds overlapping or duplication or conflict, it shall recommend modifications  in the
application. The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall consider  these recommenda-
tions in making its decision  to approve or disapprove the application. The department shall complete
its review and forward its recommendations within 15 working days after receipt of the notification.
Failure of the department to complete the review within that time shall constitute approval of  the
application by the department.
(4) The Director of the Housing and Community Services Department may  participate in dis-
cussions and deliberations of the council. The director  may suggest policies and rules to the council,
including those  necessary to stimulate and increase the supply of housing for persons and families
of lower income.
SECTION 5.
The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(1) ORS 458.620 (1)(f) (2019 Edition) and 458.667 (2019  Edition) established and regulated
the use of the Wildfire Damage Housing Relief Account within the Oregon Housing Fund.
(2) The Wildfire Damage Housing Relief Account was  abolished by section 38, chapter 10,
Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session),  the amendments to ORS 458.620 by section 39,
chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), and the repeal of  ORS 458.667 by
section 40, chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session).
(3) On September 20, 2020, the Governor purported  to veto sections 38 to 40, chapter 10,
Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), citing the single-item veto exception allowed  for
appropriation bills under Article V, section 15a, of the Oregon Constitution.
(4) Oregon courts have not interpreted  the term “appropriation bills” for purposes of
Article V, section 15a, of the Oregon Constitution.
(5) There may exist a legal dispute as to whether the Wildfire Damage  Housing Relief
Account was abolished by sections 38  to 40, chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special
session), considering the Governor’s purported single-item veto.
(6) The  repeal of ORS 458.667 by section 6 of this 2023 Act is intended to confirm that,
regardless of the  effect of the Governor’s purported single-item veto, the Wildfire Damage
Housing Relief Account is abolished  and ORS 458.667 is repealed. Any moneys remaining in
the account on the effective date  of this 2023 Act shall be transferred to the General Fund
for general governmental purposes.
SECTION 6. ORS 458.667 is repealed.
SECTION 7. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3215 (HB 3215-A) Page 3
Passed by House June 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3215 (HB 3215-A) Page 4